North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 19. Transfers to Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

§ 143A-239.
North Carolina National Guard.

The North Carolina National Guard as provided for in Chapter 127A is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

§ 143A-240.
North Carolina Civil Preparedness Agency.

The State Civil Preparedness Agency as provided for in Chapter 166 is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

§ 143A-241.
State Civil Air Patrol.

The State Civil Air Patrol as provided for in G.S. 167-2 is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

§ 143A-242.
State Highway Patrol.

The State Highway Patrol as provided for in Article 4 of Chapter 20 is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

§ 143A-243.
North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission Enforcement Division.

The North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission Enforcement Division as provided for in Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 18A is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

§ 143A-244.
Governor’s Crime Commission.

The Governor’s Crime Commission as provided for in Part 23 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B and 1977 Session Laws, Chapter 11 is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

§ 143A-245.
Crime Control Division.

The Crime Control Division, Department of Natural and Economic Resources, as provided for in Part 23 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B and 1977 Session Laws, Chapter 11 is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, to the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.